Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459.386 is amended to read:
459.386. As used in ORS 459.386 to 459.405:
(1) “Biological waste” includes blood  and blood products, excretions, exudates, secretions,
suctionings and other  body fluids that cannot be directly discarded into a municipal sewer system,
and waste materials saturated  with blood or body fluids, but does not include diapers soiled with
urine or feces.
(2) “Cultures and stocks” includes etiologic agents and associated biologicals, including  speci-
men cultures and dishes and devices used to transfer,  inoculate and mix cultures, wastes from pro-
duction of biologicals,  and serums and discarded live and attenuated vaccines.  “Cultures and
stocks” does not include throat and urine cultures.
(3) “Disposal” means the final placement of  treated infectious waste in a disposal site operating
under a permit issued by a state or federal agency.
(4) “Infectious waste” includes biological waste,  cultures and stocks, pathological waste and
sharps.
(5)(a) “Pathological waste” includes:
(A) Biopsy materials and all human tissues;
(B) Anatomical parts that emanate from  surgeries, autopsies and obstetrical and laboratory
procedures; and
(C) Animal carcasses exposed to pathogens in research and the  bedding and other waste from
such animals.
(b) “Pathological waste” does not include teeth or formaldehyde or other preservative agents.
(6) “Sharps” includes needles, IV tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, lancets,  glass
tubes that could be broken during handling and syringes that have been  removed from their original
sterile containers.
(7) “Storage” means the temporary containment of  infectious waste in a manner that does not
constitute treatment or disposal of such waste.
(8) “Transportation” means the movement of infectious waste from the point of generation  over
a public highway to any intermediate point or to the point of final treatment.
(9) “Treatment” means incineration, sterilization or other method, technique or process ap-
proved by the  Oregon Health Authority that changes the character or composition of any infectious
waste so as to render the waste noninfectious.
(10) “Waste pharmaceuticals” means discarded pharmaceuticals that are not:
Enrolled Senate Bill 139 (SB 139-B) Page 1
(a) Hazardous waste, as defined in ORS 466.005;
(b) Radioactive waste, as defined in ORS 469.300; or
(c) A radioactive substance, as defined in ORS 453.005.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 459.390 is amended to read:
459.390. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection,  infectious waste shall
be segregated from other wastes by separate containment at the point of generation.
(b) A person may consolidate sharps and waste pharmaceuticals into  a single container,
which may be reusable, provided that:
(A) The container satisfies the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) The entire contents of the  container are managed as infectious waste in accordance
with ORS 459.386 to 459.405.
(c) Enclosures used  for storage of infectious waste shall be secured to prevent access by unau-
thorized persons and shall be marked with prominent warning signs.
(2) Infectious waste, except for sharps, shall be contained in disposable red plastic bags  or
containers made of other materials impervious to moisture  and strong enough to prevent ripping,
tearing or bursting under normal conditions of use. The bags or containers  shall be closed to pre-
vent leakage or expulsion of solid or liquid wastes during storage, collection or transportation.
(3)(a) Sharps  shall be contained for storage, collection, transportation and disposal in leakproof,
rigid, puncture-resistant red containers that  are taped closed or tightly lidded to prevent loss of the
contents. Sharps may be stored in such containers for more than seven days.
(b) Sharps  consolidated with waste pharmaceuticals shall be contained for storage, col-
lection, transportation and treatment in leakproof,  rigid, puncture-resistant and tightly
lidded containers that are  a distinctive color other than red and conspicuously labeled with
the international biohazard symbol. Sharps consolidated with waste pharmaceuticals may be
stored in such containers for more than seven days.
(4) All  bags, boxes or other containers for infectious waste and rigid containers of discarded
sharps shall be clearly identified as containing infectious waste.
(5) Infectious waste shall be stored at temperatures and only  for times established by rules of
the Oregon Health Authority.
(6) Infectious waste shall  not be compacted before treatment and shall not be placed for col-
lection, storage or transportation in a portable or mobile trash compactor.
(7) Infectious  waste contained in disposable bags as specified in this section shall be placed for
collection, storage, handling or transportation in a disposable or reusable pail, carton,  box, drum,
dumpster, portable bin or similar container. The container  shall have a tight-fitting cover and be
kept clean and in good repair. The container may be of any  color and shall be conspicuously labeled
with the international biohazard symbol and the words “Biomedical Waste”  on the sides so as to
be readily visible from any lateral direction when the container is upright.
(8) Each time a reusable container for infectious waste is emptied,  the container shall be thor-
oughly washed and decontaminated  unless the surfaces of the container have been protected from
contamination by a disposable red liner, bag or other device removed with the waste.
(9) Trash chutes shall not be used to transfer infectious waste between locations where it  is
contained or stored.
(10) Generators that produce 50 pounds or less of infectious waste in any  calendar month shall
be exempt from the specific requirements of subsections (5), (7) and (8) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 459.395 is amended to read:
459.395. (1) Pathological  wastes shall be treated by incineration in an incinerator that provides
complete combustion of waste to carbonized  or mineralized ash. The ash shall be disposed of as
provided in rules adopted by the  Environmental Quality Commission. However, if the Department
of Environmental Quality determines that incineration is  not reasonably available within a
wasteshed, pathological wastes may be disposed of in  the same manner provided for cultures and
stocks.
Enrolled Senate Bill 139 (SB 139-B) Page 2
(2) Cultures and stocks shall  be incinerated as described in subsection (1) of this section or
sterilized by other means prescribed by  Oregon Health Authority rule. Sterilized waste may be dis-
posed of in a permitted land disposal site if it is not otherwise classified as hazardous waste.
(3) Liquid or soluble semisolid biological wastes may be discharged into  a sewage treatment
system that provides secondary treatment of waste.
(4)(a) Sharps and biological wastes may be  incinerated as described in subsection (1) of this
section  or  sterilized by other means prescribed by authority rule. Sharps may be disposed of in a
permitted land disposal site only if the sharps are in containers as required in ORS  459.390 (3) and
are placed in a segregated area of the landfill.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, sharps consolidated with waste
pharmaceuticals shall be treated by incineration in  an incinerator that is authorized to ac-
cept sharps and waste pharmaceuticals under a permit issued by a state or federal agency.
(5) Other methods of treatment and disposal may be approved by rule of the commission.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 139 (SB 139-B) Page 3